Maryland, session 2026, HB1388.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
4–1011.
(A) THERE IS A 5–YEAR ROTATIONAL HARVEST PILOT PROGRAM FOR
OYSTERS TO BE IMPLEMENTED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1388*

HOUSE BILL 1388
(B) THE PILOT PROGRAM SHALL APPLY TO FOUR DESIGNATED AREAS OF
THE CHESAPEAKE BAY, AS FOLLOWS:
(1) THE LOWER CHOPTANK ROTATIONAL HARVEST AREA, WHICH
CONSISTS OF ALL OF THE WATERS OF THE LOWER CHOPTANK RIVER ENCLOSED BY
A LINE BEGINNING AT A POINT ON THE SHORE OF HORN POINT DEFINED BY LAT.
38°36.324’ N, LONG. 76°8.451’ W; THEN RUNNING WESTERLY ALONG THE
SOUTHERLY SHORE OF THE CHOPTANK RIVER (INCLUDING ALL CREEKS, COVES,
AND BAYS) TO A POINT ON THE SHORE OF TODDS POINT DEFINED BY LAT. 38°37.683’
N, LONG. 76°14.168’ W; THEN RUNNING 38° TRUE TO A POINT DEFINED BY LAT.
38°38.664’ N, LONG. 76°13.197’ W; THEN RUNNING 112° TRUE TO A POINT DEFINED
BY LAT. 38°38.562’ N, LONG. 76°12.874’ W; THEN RUNNING 98° TRUE TO A POINT
DEFINED BY LAT. 38°38.518’ N, LONG. 76°12.494’ W; THEN RUNNING 84° TRUE TO A
POINT DEFINED BY LAT. 38°38.576’ N, LONG. 76°11.793’ W; THEN RUNNING 71°
TRUE TO A POINT DEFINED BY LAT. 38°38.732’ N, LONG. 76°11.226’ W; THEN
RUNNING 60° TRUE TO A POINT DEFINED BY LAT. 38°38.790’ N, LONG. 76°11.095’
W; THEN RUNNING 91° TRUE TO A POINT DEFINED BY LAT. 38°38.789’ N, LONG.
76°10.919’ W; THEN RUNNING 108° TRUE TO A POINT DEFINED BY LAT. 38°38.680’
N, LONG. 76°10.498’ W; THEN RUNNING 123° TRUE TO A POINT DEFINED BY LAT.
38°38.536’ N, LONG. 76°10.221’ W; THEN RUNNING 134° TRUE TO A POINT DEFINED
BY LAT. 38°38.095’ N, LONG. 76°9.631’ W; THEN RUNNING 122° TRUE TO A POINT
DEFINED BY LAT. 38°37.933’ N, LONG. 76°9.296’ W; THEN RUNNING 103° TRUE TO A
POINT DEFINED BY LAT. 38°37.884’ N, LONG. 76°9.023’ W; THEN RUNNING 87° TRUE
TO A POINT DEFINED BY LAT. 38°37.898’ N, LONG. 76°8.684’ W; THEN RUNNING 92°
TRUE TO A POINT DEFINED BY LAT. 38°37.890’ N, LONG. 76°8.408’ W; THEN
RUNNING 106° TRUE TO A POINT DEFINED BY LAT. 38°37.866’ N, LONG. 76°8.302’
W; THEN RUNNING 128° TRUE TO A POINT DEFINED BY LAT. 38°37.810’ N, LONG.
76°8.212’ W; THEN RUNNING 165° TRUE TO A POINT DEFINED BY LAT. 38°37.496’ N,
LONG. 76°8.108’ W; THEN RUNNING 176° TRUE TO A POINT DEFINED BY LAT.
38°37.260’ N, LONG. 76°8.084’ W; THEN RUNNING 180° TRUE TO A POINT DEFINED
BY LAT. 38°36.846’ N, LONG. 76°8.080’ W; THEN RUNNING 169° TRUE TO A POINT
DEFINED BY LAT. 38°36.671’ N, LONG. 76°8.039’ W; THEN RUNNING 153° TRUE TO A
POINT DEFINED BY LAT. 38°36.534’ N, LONG. 76°7.949’ W; THEN RUNNING 140°
TRUE TO A POINT DEFINED BY LAT. 38°36.507’ N, LONG. 76°7.920’ W; THEN
RUNNING 246° TRUE TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING;
(2) THE LOWER MAIN STEM CHESAPEAKE BAY ROTATIONAL
HARVEST AREA, WHICH CONSISTS OF ALL OF THE WATERS OF THE AREA ENCLOSED
BY A LINE BEGINNING AT A POINT DEFINED BY LAT. 37° 58.800’ N, LONG. 76° 4.680’
W; THEN RUNNING 283° TRUE TO A POINT DEFINED BY LAT. 37° 59.798’ N, LONG.
76° 9.965’ W; THEN RUNNING 342° TRUE TO A POINT DEFINED BY LAT. 38° 8.366’ N,
LONG. 76° 13.580’ W; THEN RUNNING 81° TRUE TO A POINT DEFINED BY LAT. 38°

HOUSE BILL 1388 3
9.181’ N, LONG. 76° 6.720’ W; THEN RUNNING 171° TRUE TO THE POINT OF
BEGINNING;
(3) THE HERRING BAY ROTATIONAL HARVEST AREA, WHICH
CONSISTS OF ALL OF THE WATERS OF THE AREA ENCLOSED BY A LINE BEGINNING AT
A POINT DEFINED BY LAT. 38°41.237’ N, LONG. 76°30.215’ W; THEN RUNNING 272°
TRUE TO A POINT ON SHORE AT CHESAPEAKE BEACH, DEFINED BY LAT. 38°41.278’
N, LONG. 76°31.974’ W; THEN RUNNING NORTHERLY ALONG THE SHORE TO A POINT
ON SHORE AT FRANKLIN POINT DEFINED BY LAT. 38°49.048’ N, LONG. 76°29.869’
W; THEN RUNNING 95° TRUE TO A POINT DEFINED BY LAT. 38°48.915’ N, LONG.
76°27.761’ W; THEN RUNNING 194° TRUE TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING; AND
(4) THE LOWER CHESTER ROTATIONAL HARVEST AREA, WHICH
CONSISTS OF THE AREA ENCLOSED BY A LINE BEGINNING AT A POINT ON THE SHORE
AT LONG POINT IN THE CHESTER RIVER DEFINED BY LAT. 38°58.798’ N, LONG.
76°13.825’ W; THEN RUNNING 272° TRUE TO A POINT ON SHORE AT FERRY POINT
DEFINED BY LAT. 38°58.819’ N, LONG. 76°14.626’ W; THEN RUNNING
NORTHWESTERLY ALONG THE SHORE TO LOVE POINT AND THEN SOUTHERLY
ALONG THE WEST SHORE OF KENT ISLAND TO A POINT DEFINED BY LAT. 39°1.521’
N, LONG. 76°19.123’ W; THEN RUNNING 270° TRUE TO A POINT DEFINED BY LAT.
39°1.531’ N, LONG. 76°20.782’ W; THEN RUNNING 31° TRUE TO A POINT ON SHORE
AT GRATITUDE, DEFINED BY LAT. 39°8.366’ N, LONG. 76°15.579’ W; THEN RUNNING
SOUTHERLY ALONG THE SHORE TO A POINT AT THE NORTH SIDE OF EASTERN NECK
NARROWS, DEFINED BY LAT. 39°3.337’ N, LONG. 76°13.327’ W; THEN RUNNING 192°
TRUE TO A POINT AT THE SOUTH SIDE OF EASTERN NECK NARROWS, DEFINED BY
LAT. 39°03.300’ N, LONG. 76°13.337’ W; THEN RUNNING SOUTHERLY ALONG THE
WEST SHORE OF EASTERN NECK ISLAND TO PANHANDLE POINT DEFINED BY LAT.
39°0.936’ N, LONG. 76°13.444’ W; THEN RUNNING 188° TRUE TO THE POINT OF
BEGINNING.
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) IN ITS DISCRETION OPEN ONE DIFFERENT OYSTER BAR
WITHIN THE LOWER CHOPTANK RIVER SANCTUARY FOR EACH OF THE 2026–2027,
2027–2028, AND 2028–2029 OYSTER SEASONS;
(II) REOPEN THE SAME OYSTER BAR FOR THE 2029–2030
OYSTER SEASON THAT IT HAD OPENED FOR THE 2026–2027 OYSTER SEASON; AND
(III) REOPEN THE SAME OYSTER BAR FOR THE 2030–2031
OYSTER SEASON THAT IT HAD OPENED FOR THE 2027–2028 OYSTER SEASON.

HOUSE BILL 1388
(2) OF THE THREE OYSTER BARS LOCATED WITHIN THE LOWER MAIN
STEM CHESAPEAKE BAY ROTATIONAL HARVEST AREA, THE DEPARTMENT IN ITS
DISCRETION SHALL:
(I) OPEN ONE DIFFERENT OYSTER BAR FOR EACH OF THE
2026–2027, 2027–2028, AND 2028–2029 OYSTER SEASONS;
(II) REOPEN THE SAME OYSTER BAR FOR THE 2029–2030
OYSTER SEASON THAT IT HAD OPENED FOR THE 2026–2027 OYSTER SEASON; AND
(III) REOPEN THE SAME OYSTER BAR FOR THE 2030–2031
OYSTER SEASON THAT IT HAD OPENED FOR THE 2027–2028 OYSTER SEASON.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL OPEN THE HOLLAND POINT OYSTER
BAR IN THE HERRING BAY ROTATIONAL HARVEST AREA IN THE FOLLOWING
OYSTER SEASONS:
(I) THE 2026–2027 OYSTER SEASON; AND
(II) THE 2029–2030 OYSTER SEASON.
(4) OF THE HICKORY THICKET OYSTER BAR AND HUNTING FIELD
OYSTER BAR LOCATED WITHIN THE LOWER CHESTER RIVER ROTATIONAL AREA,
THE DEPARTMENT IN ITS DISCRETION SHALL:
(I) OPEN ONE DIFFERENT OYSTER BAR FOR EACH OF THE
2026–2027 AND 2027–2028 OYSTER SEASONS;
(II) REOPEN THE SAME OYSTER BAR FOR THE 2029–2030
OYSTER SEASON THAT IT HAD OPENED FOR THE 2026–2027 OYSTER SEASON; AND
(III) REOPEN THE SAME OYSTER BAR FOR THE 2030–2031
OYSTER SEASON THAT IT HAD OPENED FOR THE 2027–2028 OYSTER SEASON.
(D) (1) A TIDAL FISH LICENSEE WHO HOLDS AN OYSTER AUTHORIZATION
MAY CATCH OYSTERS IN AREAS OF THE LOWER CHOPTANK RIVER ROTATIONAL
HARVEST AREA, THE LOWER MAIN STEM CHESAPEAKE BAY ROTATIONAL
HARVEST AREA, THE HERRING BAY ROTATIONAL HARVEST AREA, AND THE LOWER
CHESTER ROTATIONAL HARVEST AREA THAT ARE OPEN FOR HARVEST.
(2) A TIDAL FISH LICENSEE WHO CATCHES OYSTERS UNDER THE
PILOT PROGRAM SHALL ENSURE THAT THE OYSTER SHELLS ARE REPLACED ON THE

HOUSE BILL 1388 5
BAR WHERE THEY WERE CAUGHT IN AN AMOUNT OF BUSHELS EQUAL TO THE
AMOUNT OF BUSHELS OF OYSTERS CAUGHT.
(E) UNDER THE PILOT PROGRAM, THE DEPARTMENT:
(1) IN ITS DISCRETION, SHALL MANAGE THE OYSTER HARVEST; AND
(2) MAY:
(I) ADJUST CATCH LIMITS;
(II) LIMIT THE HOURS AND DAYS FOR HARVEST; AND
(III) RESTRICT THE GEAR THAT MAY BE USED.
(F) (1) BEFORE OPENING AN AREA TO OYSTER HARVESTING UNDER THE
PILOT PROGRAM, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SURVEY AND INVESTIGATE THE AREA
TO COLLECT BASELINE DATA ON:
(I) WATER QUALITY;
(II) HABITAT QUALITY, INCLUDING THE PRESENCE OF FINFISH
SPECIES AND OTHER SHELLFISH SPECIES;
(III) THE PRESENCE OF:
1. SILT AND SEDIMENT ON THE OYSTER BAR;
2. SUBMERGED AQUATIC VEGETATION ON OR NEAR THE
OYSTER BAR; AND
3. DISEASED OR DEAD OYSTERS ON THE OYSTER BAR;
AND
(IV) ANY OTHER RELEVANT MATTER IN THE DISCRETION OF THE
DEPARTMENT.
(2) AFTER CLOSING AN AREA IN THE ROTATIONAL HARVEST AREAS
TO OYSTER HARVESTING UNDER THE PILOT PROGRAM, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
CONTINUE TO MONITOR THE AREA TO COLLECT ADDITIONAL DATA ON THE MATTERS
DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.

HOUSE BILL 1388
(G) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2031, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT
TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON ITS FINDINGS AND
RECOMMENDATIONS UNDER THE PILOT PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 6 years and, at the end of June 30, 2032,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.